Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2101
Learning community, defined; fiscal year.

Learning community means a political subdivision which shares the territory of member school districts and is governed by a learning community coordinating council. The fiscal year for a learning community shall be the same as for member school districts.

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 103;

Laws 2007, LB641, § 35.